Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.09
Community, defined.

Community means
a franchisee's area of responsibility as stipulated in the franchise or, if
the franchise fails to designate a community, (1) the community of the franchisee
is the area surrounding the location of the franchisee in a five-mile radius
from the dealership if the location is within a city of the metropolitan class
and (2) the community of the franchisee is the county in which the franchisee
is located if the location is not within a city of the metropolitan class.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 21.